Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-210
Municipality; costs; paid by appropriation of funds or bonds; cost, defined.

The cost of investigating, surveying, planning, acquiring, establishing, constructing, enlarging or improving or equipping airports and other air navigation facilities, and the sites therefor, including structures and other property incidental to their operation, in accordance with the provisions of sections 3-201 to 3-238 and 18-1502 may be paid for by appropriation of money available therefor, or wholly or partly from the proceeds of bonds of the municipality, as the governing body of the municipality shall determine. The word cost includes awards in condemnation proceedings and rentals where an acquisition is by lease.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 6(1), p. 159.